Wyoming, session 2026, HB0112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 187,
Section 9(f) and (g) is amended to read:
Section 9.
(f) The task force shall terminate on June
30, 2028 April 1, 2026.
(g) There is appropriated fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028 June 30, 2026. This
appropriation shall only be for purposes of
providing salary, mileage and per diem of
legislative members of the task force.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this
appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation on June 30, 2026 shall revert as
provided by law on June 30, 2028 be deposited to
the legislative stabilization reserve account.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0112
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2